Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.574

Early intervention services—Infants and toddlers with disabilities—Interagency coordinating council—Coordination with counties and communities.

The state interagency coordinating council for infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families shall identify and work with county early childhood interagency coordinating councils to coordinate and enhance existing early intervention services and assist each community to meet the needs of infants and toddlers with disabilities and their families.

[ 2020 c 114 s 7; 2016 c 57 s 2; 1992 c 198 s 17. Formerly RCW 43.215.474, 70.195.020.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2020 c 114: See note following RCW 28A.175.075.